District of Columbia statutes.
32-1103

Duties of employer and employees.

(a)

Each employer shall:

(1)

Furnish employees with a place and conditions of employment that are free from recognized hazards that may cause or are likely to cause death or serious physical harm or illness to the employees; and

(2)

Comply with all occupational safety and health rules promulgated and orders issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

Each employee shall comply with all occupational safety and health rules promulgated and orders issued pursuant to this chapter which are applicable to the actions and conduct of the employee.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 4, 35 DCR 8250
Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1101, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.
1981 Ed., § 36-1203.
This section is referenced in § 32-1114, § 32-1120, and § 32-1124.